Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6196.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), under subsection (2), a bond, in the form prescribed by the administrator, in the penal sum of $20,000.00 shall must accompany the first application by a person for license as a sales finance company and shall must apply only to the principal place of business of the licensee. A bond, in the form prescribed by the administrator, in the penal sum of $10,000.00 shall must accompany each application by a licensee for an additional location to transact business as a sales finance company. (2) (b) Each A bond required under subdivision (a) shall subsection (1) must be in the penal sum of $5,000.00 if the applicant is licensed under any of the following: (a) For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, Act No. 173 of the Public Acts of 1987, being sections 445.1651 to 445.1683 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, Act No. 125 of the Public Acts of 1981, being sections 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684. (b) For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, the secondary mortgage loan act, 1981 PA 125, MCL 493.51 to 493.81. of the Michigan Compiled Laws, or the (c) Beginning on the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act. (d) The regulatory loan act, of 1963, Act No. 21 of the Public Acts of 1939, being sections 493.1 to 493.26 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1939 PA 21, MCL 493.1 to 493.24. (3) (c) The A bond required under subdivision (a) shall subsection (1) must be executed by a surety company authorized by the laws of this state to transact business within in this state. A bond accompanying an application for license as a sales finance company, filed by a financial institution located within in this state, may be executed by a financial institution on its own behalf, instead of a bond executed by a surety company. The bond shall must be executed to the state of Michigan and shall must be for the use of the this state and for any person. or persons. The condition of the bond shall be must require that the licensee will comply with and abide by all the provisions of this act , and all the rules and regulations of the administrator lawfully issued, and require that the licensee will pay to the this state, to the administrator, or to any person, or persons, any and all money that may become due to the this state, to the administrator, or to any person or persons from the licensee under the provisions of this act. A person who that is aggrieved by the misconduct of a licensee and who that has recovered a judgment against a licensee, and whose judgment is not satisfied within 30 days after it becomes final, may maintain an action upon on the bond of the licensee in any court having jurisdiction of the amount claimed. Service of process for such an action under this subsection may be served anywhere within in this state. (4) (d) A new bond or renewal certificate shall must accompany every application for renewal license and shall must be filed annually at least 15 days before July 1. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6177 (request no. H05171'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.